California, session 20252026, AB1589.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 33415 of the Penal Code is amended to read:33415. Section 33410 shall not apply to, or affect, any of the following:(a) The sale to, purchase by, or possession of silencers by agencies listed in Section 830.1, or the military or naval forces of this state or of the United States, for use in the discharge of their official duties.(b) The possession of silencers by regular, salaried, full-time peace officers who are employed by an agency listed in Section 830.1, or by the military or naval forces of this state or of the United States, when on duty and when the use of silencers is authorized by the agency and is within the course and scope of their duties.(c) The possession of silencers by level I reserve peace officers, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 832.6, who are deputized or appointed by an agency listed in Section 830.1, when on duty and when the use of silencers is authorized by the agency and is within the course and scope of their duties. duties, if the silencer is owned by a law enforcement agency, and affixed to a rifle owned by a law enforcement agency, listed in Section 830.1.(d) The manufacture, possession, transportation, or sale or other transfer of silencers to an entity described in subdivision (a) by dealers or manufacturers registered under Chapter 53 (commencing with Section 5801) of Title 26 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.